Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.050

Effect of dissolution.

(1) A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

(a) Collecting its assets;

(b) Disposing of its properties that will be applied toward satisfaction or making reasonable provision for satisfaction of its liabilities or will otherwise not be distributed in kind to its shareholders, but in any case subject to applicable liens and security interests as well as any applicable contractual restrictions on the disposition of its properties;

(c) Satisfying or making reasonable provision for satisfying its liabilities, in accordance with their priorities as established by law, and on a pro rata basis within each class of liabilities;

(d) Subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 23B.06.400, distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

(e) Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, dissolution of a corporation does not:

(a) Transfer title to the corporation's property;

(b) Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation's share transfer records;

(c) Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in chapter 23B.08 RCW;

(d) Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

(e) Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

(f) Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

(g) Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

(3) A dissolved corporation's board of directors may make a determination that reasonable provision for the satisfaction of any liability, whether arising in tort or by contract, statute, or otherwise, and whether matured or unmatured, contingent, or conditional, has been made by means of a purchase of insurance coverage, provision of security therefor, contractual assumption thereof by a solvent person, or any other means, that the board of directors determines is reasonably calculated to provide for satisfaction of the reasonably estimated amount of such liability. Upon making such a determination, the board of directors shall, for purposes of determining whether a subsequent distribution to shareholders is prohibited under *RCW 23B.06.400(2), be entitled to treat such liability as fully satisfied by the assets used or committed in order to make such provision. In making determinations under *RCW 23B.06.400(2), the board of directors of a dissolved corporation may also disregard, and make no provision for the satisfaction of, any liabilities that are barred in accordance with RCW 23B.14.060(2), or that may exceed any provision for their satisfaction ordered by a superior court pursuant to RCW 23B.14.065, or that the board of directors does not consider, based on the facts known to it, reasonably likely to arise prior to expiration of the survival period specified in RCW 23B.14.340.

(4) The board of directors of a dissolved corporation may at any time petition to have the dissolution continued under court supervision in accordance with RCW 23B.14.300, or, upon a finding that the corporation is not able to pay its liabilities as they become due in the usual course of business or that its assets are less than the sum of its total liabilities, may dedicate the corporation's assets to the repayment of its creditors by making an assignment for the benefit of creditors in accordance with chapter 7.08 RCW or obtaining the appointment of a general receiver in accordance with chapter 7.60 RCW. The assumption of control over the corporation's assets by a court, an assignee for the benefit of creditors, or a general receiver relieves the directors of any further duties with respect to the liquidation of the corporation's assets or the application of any assets or proceeds toward satisfaction of its liabilities.

(5) Corporate actions to be approved by a corporation that has been dissolved under RCW 23B.14.030 or ** 23B.14.210, which are within the scope of activities permitted in this chapter, may be approved by the corporation's board of directors and, if required, by its shareholders, membership in both groups determined as of the effective date of the dissolution. If vacancies in the board of directors occur after the effective date of dissolution, the shareholders, or the remaining directors, even if less than a quorum of the board, may fill the vacancies. A special meeting of the shareholders for purposes of approving any corporate action required or permitted to be approved by shareholders, or for purposes of electing directors, may be called by any person who was an officer, director, or shareholder of the corporation at the effective date of the dissolution.

[ 2009 c 189 s 53; 2006 c 52 s 8; 1989 c 165 s 158.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 23B.06.400 was amended by 2022 c 42 s 103, changing subsection (2) to subsection (3).

**(2) RCW 23B.14.210 was repealed by 2015 c 176 s 2149, effective January 1, 2016.